Washington statutes.
RCW 35.75.040

Rules regulating use of bicycle paths.

The license fee to be paid and the rules regulating the riding of bicycles or other similar vehicles within any city or town shall be fixed by ordinance, and the rules regulating the use of such bicycle paths or roadways constructed or maintained within its limits and the fines and penalties for the violation of such rules shall be fixed by ordinance.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.75.040. Prior: 1899 c 31 s 5; RRS s 9208.]